Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF438.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2721XS (4) 91 dg/ko S.F. 438 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 34B.1 Definitions. 1 1. For purposes of this chapter: 2 a. â988 serviceâ means a service which provides the user 3 of a public telephone system the ability to reach a suicide 4 and crisis lifeline by dialing or texting the digits 9-8-8, or 5 using an internet site chat function. 6 b. âDepartmentâ means the department of health and human 7 services. 8 2. A 988 emergency service fund is created in the state 9 treasury under the control of the department. Moneys in the 10 fund are appropriated to the department for purposes described 11 in subsection 4. 12 3. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and each 13 fiscal year thereafter, there is transferred to the 988 14 emergency service fund from the general fund of the state the 15 sum of three million dollars. 16 4. Moneys in the 988 emergency service fund shall be 17 distributed by the department to persons operating a 988 18 service in this state in the event that federal funding for 988 19 services terminates, becomes delayed, or is otherwise impacted 20 in such a way that 988 service is interrupted in the state. 21 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 22 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 23